California statutes. Water Code
(b) This chapter does not prohibit or restrict the transfer of water or water rights by local or regional public agencies pursuant to other provisions of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 188, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

383.

For the purposes of this chapter, water that is surplus to the needs of the agency’s water users shall mean any of the following:

(a) Water, to which the right is held by the agency pursuant to an appropriation made under the Water Commission Act or Division 2 (commencing with Section 1000), which the agency finds will be in excess of the needs of water users within the agency for the duration of the transfer.

(b) Water, to which the right is held by the agency pursuant to an appropriation made under the Water Commission Act or Division 2 (commencing with Section 1000), of which any water user agrees with the agency, upon mutually satisfactory terms, to forego use for the duration of the transfer.

(c) Water, to which the right is held by a water user within the agency pursuant to an appropriation made under the Water Commission Act or Division 2 (commencing with Section 1000) where the water user and the agency agree, upon mutually satisfactory terms, that the water user will forego use for the period of time specified in the agreement and that the agency shall act as agent for the water user to effect the transfer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 867, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

384.

Prior to serving water to any person for use outside the agency, the agency shall comply with all provisions of the general laws of this state relating to the transfer of water or water rights, including, but not limited to, procedural and substantive requirements governing any change in point of diversion, place of use, or purpose of use due to such transfer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 867, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

385.

No water may be transferred pursuant to this chapter for use within the boundaries of a local or regional public agency that furnishes the same water service to the transferee without the prior consent of that agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 867, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

386.

The board may approve any change associated with a transfer pursuant to this chapter only if it finds that the change may be made without injuring any legal user of the water and without unreasonably affecting fish, wildlife, or other instream beneficial uses and does not unreasonably affect the overall economy of the area from which the water is being transferred.

A petitioner requesting a change which is subject to this section shall pay to the board a fee which shall be in an amount determined by the board to cover the reasonable costs of the board in evaluating and processing the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 867, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

387.

Any agreement for the transfer of water under the provisions of this chapter shall be for a period not to exceed seven years unless a longer period of time is mutually agreed upon by the agency and the transferee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 364, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.7. Water Standby and Availability Charges [389. - 389.]

389.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the term water standby charge and the term water availability charge have the same meaning.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 778, Sec. 1.   Effective September 21, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.8. Cost-of-Service Analysis [390. - 390.1.]

390.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Costs of water service for the highest users” means the difference in costs, including applicable capital costs and operation and maintenance costs, that the public entity incurs directly, or by contract, as a result of the increased water service required by its high water users. “Costs of water service for the highest users”
 may be reported by customer class, rate classification, or cumulatively, and may include any of the following:

(1) Conservation best management practices, conservation education, irrigation controls and other conservation devices, and other demand management measures.

(2) Water system retrofitting, dual plumbing and facilities for production, distribution, and all uses of recycled water and other alternative water supplies.

(3) Projects and programs for the prevention, control, or treatment of the runoff of water from irrigation and other outdoor water uses. Incremental costs do not include the costs of stormwater management systems and programs.

(4) Securing dry year water supplies.

(5) Procuring water supplies, including supply or capacity contracts for water supply rights or entitlements.

(6) Energy costs for water delivery.

(b) “High water users” means the top 10 percent of water, in terms of volume of water consumed. Alternatively, for a public entity that has allocation-based conservation water pricing pursuant to Section 372, the public entity may define high water users as those customers whose water use is above the water budget assigned to them by that public entity.

(c) “Public entity” means a city, whether general law or chartered,
 county, city and county, special district, agency, authority, any other municipal public corporation or district, or any other political subdivision of the state that provides retail water service and that is an urban water supplier, as defined in Section 10617.

(d) “Water usage demand analysis” means an analysis conducted to determine water usage patterns and demands placed on a water system operated by a public entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 542, Sec. 1.   (AB 755)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

390.1.

(a) A public entity shall conduct a water usage demand analysis prior to completing, or as a part of, a cost-of-service analysis conducted to set fees and charges for water service that are consistent with Section 6 of Article XIII D of the California Constitution and other applicable law. Within the water usage demand analysis, a public entity shall identify both of the following:

(1) The
 costs of water service
 for the highest users incurred by the public entity.

(2) The average annual volume of water delivered to high water users.

(b) The costs of water service and the average annual volume identified in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) shall be made publicly available by posting the information in the public entity’s cost-of-service analysis.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 542, Sec. 1.   (AB 755)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Weather Resources Management [400. - 420.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [400. - 402.]

400.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the California Weather Resources Management Act of 1984.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 950, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

401.

It is hereby declared that atmospheric water within the state which is caused to fall by weather resources management activities shall, for the purpose of water rights determinations, be considered as if it occurred as natural precipitation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 950, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

402.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Weather resources management” means attempting to produce by physical means any of the following: cloud water conversion, light adjustment, or weather hazard suppression. Weather resources management does not include agricultural frost protection or inadvertent weather modification.

(b) “Weather resources management project” or “project” means the performance of weather resources management with a specified purpose within a specified geographical area over a specified time interval.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 950, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Notice of Intention [410. - 412.]

410.

Before commencing a weather resources management project, the project operator shall file with the department and cause to be published a notice of intention.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 950, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

411.

The project operator shall cause the notice of intention to be published pursuant to Section 6063 of the Government Code in a newspaper having a general circulation and published within any county wherein the project is to be conducted and in which the affected area is located, or, if the project is to be conducted in more than one county or if the affected area is located in more than one county or is located in a county other than the one in which the operation is to be conducted, then the notice shall be published in like manner in a newspaper having a general circulation and published within each of the counties. In case there is no newspaper published within the appropriate county, publication shall be made in a newspaper having a general circulation within the county. The project operator shall also send the notice of intention to the boards of supervisors of counties to be affected by the project.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 950, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

412.

Proof of publication shall be by copy of the notice as published attached to and made a part of the affidavit of the publisher or foreman of the newspaper publishing the notice.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 950, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Reporting [420. - 420.]

420.

The weather resources management project operator shall keep a record of all operations conducted, showing the equipment, the methods, the types, amounts, times, and places of seeding agents employed, a statement as to the estimated effect of the operation in relation to its intended purpose, and the name and address of each person participating or assisting in the operation. A report on the evaluation of project results shall be filed with the department within one year of the termination of a project or, in the case of an ongoing project, at least once every two years.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 950, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Federal Reports on Proposed Flood Control and Reclamation Projects [450. - 453.]

450.

The Governor, or such state official or agency as he may designate, shall receive both the preliminary documents developed by, or the formal reports of, the Chief of Engineers, Department of the Army, and the Secretary of the Interior provided for in the Flood Control Act of 1944 (58 Stat. 887, 33 U.S.C. 701-1) with respect to proposed flood control or reclamation projects, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 74.)
-------------------------------------------

451.

Within 10 days after the receipt of any such preliminary document or formal report, the Governor or his designee shall transmit copies thereof to both houses of the Legislature, if the Legislature is then in session. If not, the Governor or his designee shall transmit copies thereof to the Rules Committees of the Assembly and the Senate of the Legislature, which committees shall immediately assign them to appropriate interim committees for study.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 74.)
-------------------------------------------

452.

Any legislative committee to which such a preliminary document or formal report has been assigned may submit written comments thereon to the Governor or his designee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 74.)
-------------------------------------------

453.

The Governor or his designee shall transmit, within the time period specified in the applicable federal law, to the appropriate federal agency, together with his comments and the comments of any state department or commission as to any such preliminary document or formal report, the written comments, if any, as to such preliminary document or formal report submitted to him by either house of the Legislature, or by both houses, or by any committee of the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 74.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Water Reuse [460. - 465.]



  ARTICLE 1. Short Title [460. - 460.]

460.

This chapter shall be known as and may be cited as the Water Reuse Law of 1974.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 724, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Declaration of Policy [461. - 461.]

461.

It is hereby declared that the primary interest of the people of the state in the conservation of all available water resources requires the maximum reuse of reclaimed water in the satisfaction of requirements for beneficial uses of water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 724, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Action by the Department of Water Resources [462. - 465.]

462.

The department shall conduct studies and investigations on the availability and quality of wastewater and the uses of reclaimed water for beneficial purposes, including, but not limited to, groundwater recharge, municipal and industrial use, irrigation use, and cooling for thermal electric powerplants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 724, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

463.

The department shall study and investigate the technology of the reuse of reclaimed water and further the development of the technology of the reclamation of water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 724, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

465.

The department may assist local agencies and public utilities providing water service in applying for, and in obtaining approval of, federal and state funding and permits for cost-effective water reclamation projects and shall confer and cooperate with the board during the application and approval process.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 836, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Water Transfer [470. - 484.]



  ARTICLE 1. Short Title [470. - 470.]

470.

This chapter shall be known as and may be cited as the Costa-Isenberg Water Transfer Act of 1986.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 970, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Declaration of Policy [475. - 475.]

475.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that voluntary water transfers between water users can result in a more efficient use of water, benefiting both the buyer and the seller.

The Legislature further finds and declares that transfers of surplus water on an intermittent basis can help alleviate water shortages, save capital outlay development costs, and conserve water and energy.

The Legislature further finds and declares that it is in the public interest to conserve all available water resources, and that this interest requires the coordinated assistance of state agencies for voluntary water transfers to allow more intensive use of developed water resources in a manner that fully protects the interests of other entities which have rights to, or rely on, the water covered by a proposed transfer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 970, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. State Assistance [480. - 484.]

480.

The department shall establish an ongoing program to facilitate the voluntary exchange or transfer of water and implement the various state laws that pertain to water transfers. The department shall seek to facilitate these transactions only if the water to be transferred is already developed and being diverted from a stream for beneficial use or has been conserved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 970, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

481.

The department shall create and maintain a list of entities seeking to enter into water supply transfers, leases, exchanges, or other similar arrangements. In addition, the department shall maintain a list of the physical facilities which may be available to carry out water supply transfers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 970, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

482.

The department shall prepare a water transfer guide which shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) A review of existing and appropriate state and federal laws that pertain to water transfers, water markets, or water rights.

(b) A list of persons or public agencies throughout the state involved in water management who could be helpful to those seeking assistance to transfer water.

(c) Information and resources which
 could be used to identify potential third-party impacts and mitigation alternatives, including economic or legal issues related to the transfer of water, and environmental issues, including, but not limited to, those described in Section 1018.

(d) A description of the services available to water users from the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 387, Sec. 13.   (SB 749)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

483.

The department shall consult and coordinate its activities with other state boards, departments, agencies, or offices whose assistance may be desirable or necessary in carrying out the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 970, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

484.

(a) The temporary transfer of any water or water right that otherwise would have been consumptively used or stored by the transferor in the absence of the temporary transfer, does not in any way prejudice the transferor’s right to the use of the water in the future. 

(b) “Consumptively used,” for purposes of this section, means the amount of water which has been consumed through use by evapotranspiration, has percolated underground, or has been otherwise removed from use in the downstream water supply as a result of direct diversion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 12, Sec. 2.   Effective October 9, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Water Measurement [500. - 537.5.]



  ARTICLE 1. Short Title [500. - 500.]

500.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Water Measurement Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 407, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [510. - 517.]

510.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the provisions of this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 407, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

511.

The definition of a word applies to any of its variants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 407, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

512.

“Water purveyor” means any person who furnishes water service to another person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 407, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

513.

“Person” means any individual, firm, association, partnership, corporation, or public entity of any kind.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 407, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

514.

“Public entity” includes a city, county, city and county, whether general law or chartered, a district, board, commission, bureau, authority, agency, department, division, section, any other political subdivision of the state of any kind, or the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 407, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

515.

“Water service” means the sale, lease, rental, furnishing, or delivery of water for beneficial use, and includes, but is not limited to, contracting for that sale, lease, rental, furnishing, or delivery of water, except bottled water.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 407, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

516.

“Water meter” includes any suitable water measuring device or facility which measures or determines the volumetric flow of water.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 407, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

517.

“Submeter” means a device that measures water consumption of an individual rental unit within a multiunit residential structure or mixed-use residential and commercial structure, and that is owned and operated by the owner of the structure or the owner’s agent. As used in this section, “multiunit residential structure” and “mixed-use residential and commercial structure” mean real property containing two or more dwelling units.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 623, Sec. 4.   (SB 7)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Declaration of Policy [520. - 523.]

520.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that, pursuant to the primary interest of the people of the state to put the limited available supplies of water in this state to beneficial use to the fullest extent of which they are capable, and to prevent waste, unreasonable use, or unreasonable method of use, it is necessary to determine the quantities of water in use throughout the state to the maximum extent that is reasonable to do so.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 407, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

521.

The Legislature further finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Water furnished or used without any method of determination of the quantities of water used by the person to whom the water is furnished has caused, and will continue to cause, waste and unreasonable use of water, and that this waste and unreasonable use should be identified, isolated, and eliminated.

(b) Water metering and volumetric pricing are among the most efficient conservation tools, providing information on how much water is being used and pricing to encourage conservation.

(c) Without water meters, it is impossible for homeowners and businesses to know how much water they are using, thereby inhibiting conservation, punishing those who conserve, and rewarding those who waste water.

(d) Existing law requires the installation of a water meter as a condition of water service provided pursuant to a connection installed on or after January 1, 1992, but the continuing widespread absence of water meters and the lack of volumetric pricing could result in the inefficient use of water for municipal and industrial uses.

(e) The benefits to be gained from metering infrastructure are not recovered if urban water suppliers do not use this infrastructure.

(f) This chapter addresses a subject matter of statewide concern. It is the intent of the Legislature that this chapter supersede and preempt all enactments and other local action of cities and counties, including charter cities and charter counties, and other local public agencies that conflict with this chapter, other than enactments or local actions that impose additional or more stringent requirements regarding matters set forth in this chapter.

(g) An urban water supplier should take any available necessary step consistent with state law to ensure that the implementation of this chapter does not place an unreasonable burden on low-income families.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 205.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

522.

The Legislature further finds and declares that waste or unreasonable use of water imposes unnecessary and wasteful consumption of energy to deliver or furnish the water, and it is necessary, therefore, to determine the quantities of water in use throughout the state to the maximum extent that it is reasonable to do so in order to reduce that energy consumption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 407, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

523.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the California goal for measurement of water use is the achievement by January 1, 1992, of the installation of water meters on all new water service connections after that date to systems and facilities owned, operated, or under the management or control of a water purveyor, which meters will measure the quantity of water furnished or delivered through each system or facility to each new user of the water.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 407, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Metered Service [525. - 529.7.]

525.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, every water purveyor who sells, leases, rents, furnishes, or delivers water service to any person shall require, as a condition of new water service on and after January 1, 1992, that a suitable water meter to measure the water service shall be installed on the water service facilities in accordance with this chapter. The cost of installation of the meter shall be paid by the user of the water, and any water purveyor may impose and collect charges for those costs.

(b) Subdivision (a) applies only to potable water.

(c) Subdivision (a) does not apply to a community water system which serves fewer than 15 service connections used by yearlong residents or regularly serves fewer than 25 yearlong residents, or a single well that services the water supply of a single-family residential home.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 206.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

526.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an urban water supplier that, on or after January 1, 2004, receives water from the federal Central Valley Project under a water service contract or subcontract executed pursuant to Section 485h(c) of Title 43 of the United States Code with the Bureau of Reclamation of the United States Department of the Interior shall do both of the following:

(1) On or before January 1, 2013, install water meters on all service connections to residential and nonagricultural commercial buildings constructed prior to January 1, 1992, located within its service area.

(2) On and after March 1, 2013, or according to the terms of the Central Valley Project water contract in operation, charge customers for water based on the actual volume of deliveries, as measured by a water meter.

(b) An urban water supplier that receives water from the federal Central Valley Project under a water service contract or subcontract described in subdivision (a) may recover the cost of providing services related to the purchase, installation, and operation and maintenance of water meters from rates, fees, or charges.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 111 by Stats. 2004, Ch. 884, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

527.

(a) An urban water supplier that is not subject to Section 526 shall do both of the following:

(1) Install water meters on all municipal and industrial service connections located within its service area on or before January 1, 2025.

(2) (A) Charge each customer that has a service connection for which a water meter has been installed based on the actual volume of deliveries as measured by the water meter, beginning on or before January 1, 2010.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), in order to provide customers with experience in volume-based water service charges, an urban water supplier that is subject to this subdivision may delay, for one annual seasonal cycle of water use, the use of meter-based charges for service connections that are being converted from nonvolume-based billing to volume-based billing.

(b) A water purveyor, including an urban water supplier, may recover the cost of providing services related to the purchase, installation, and operation of a water meter from rates, fees, or charges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 207.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

528.

Notwithstanding Sections 526 and 527, any water purveyor that becomes an urban water supplier on or after January 1, 2005, shall do both the following:

(a)Install water meters on all municipal and industrial service connections located within its service area within 10 years of meeting the definition of urban water supplier.

(b)(1) Charge each customer for which a water meter has been installed, based on the actual volume of water delivered, as measured by the water meter, within five years of meeting the definition of urban water supplier.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), in order to provide customers with experience in volume-based water service charges, an urban water supplier that is subject to this subdivision may delay, for one annual seasonal cycle of water use, the use of meter-based charges for service connections that are being converted from nonvolume-based billing to volume-based billing.

(c) For the purposes of this article, an “urban water supplier” has the same meaning as that set forth in Section 10617.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 884, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

529.

(a) This article addresses a subject matter of statewide concern.

(b) Subject to subdivision (c), this article supersedes and preempts all enactments, including charter provisions and amendments thereto, and other local action of cities and counties, including charter cities and charter counties, and other local public agencies that conflict with this article.

(c) This article does not supersede or preempt any enactment or other local action that imposes additional or more stringent requirements regarding matters set forth in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 884, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

529.5.

On and after January 1, 2010, any urban water supplier that applies for financial assistance from the state for a wastewater treatment project, a water use efficiency project, or a drinking water treatment project, or for a permit for a new or expanded water supply, shall demonstrate that the applicant meets the requirements of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 884, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

529.7.

This article does not limit the authority of a water purveyor that promotes conservation through volumetric water pricing, including, but not limited to, an urban water supplier that promotes conservation through volumetric water pricing, to determine and impose a rate, fee, or charge in addition to the charge for the actual volume of metered water delivered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 495, Sec. 4.   (AB 975)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Standards [530. - 530.]

530.

Domestic cold water meters shall be in compliance with relevant standards of the American Water Works Association and shall be of the type approved by the Director of Food and Agriculture pursuant to Section 12500.5 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 407, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.3. Agricultural and Urban Water Use Reporting [531. - 531.20.]

531.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this section govern the construction of this article.

(a) “Aggregated farm-gate delivery data” means information reflecting the total volume of water an agricultural water supplier provides to its customers and is calculated by totaling its deliveries to individual customers.

(b) “Agricultural water supplier” means a supplier either publicly or privately owned, supplying 2,000 acre-feet or more of surface water annually for agricultural purposes or serving 2,000 or more acres of agricultural land. An agricultural water supplier includes a supplier or contractor for water, regardless of the basis of right, which distributes or sells water for ultimate resale to customers.

(c) “Authority” means the California Bay-Delta Authority.

(d) “Best professional practices” means practices attaining and maintaining accuracy of measurement and reporting devices and methods.

(e) “Diversion” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 5100.

(f) “Farm-gate” means the point at which water is delivered from the agricultural water supplier’s distribution system to each of its customers.

(g) “Person” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (d) of Section 5100.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 675, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

531.2.

The department, the board, and the State Department of Public Health shall coordinate the collection, management, and use of agricultural and urban water measurement information provided to each agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 675, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

531.5.

(a) The board, in collaboration with the department, the authority or its successor agency, and the State Department of Public Health, shall prepare and submit a report to the Legislature by January 1, 2009, evaluating the feasibility, estimated costs, and potential means of financing a coordinated water measurement database. The evaluation shall include, but is not necessarily limited to, agricultural and urban water measurement data related to deliveries, diversions, licenses, permits, and other information received by these state agencies that supports effective state and regional water management planning and decisionmaking. The evaluation shall also consider how the database can provide information to address impacts related to climate change mitigation and adaptation.

(b) The report shall consider coordinating the collection and sharing of data through the use of technologies used by the National Environmental Information Exchange Network and the existing data exchange infrastructure of the involved agencies.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the report provide an initial feasibility assessment, and is not intended to serve as the final Feasibility Study Report required by the State Administrative Manual.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 675, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

531.10.

(a) (1) An agricultural water supplier shall submit an annual report to the department that summarizes aggregated farm-gate delivery data, on a monthly or bimonthly basis, using best professional practices. The annual report for the prior year shall be submitted to the department by April 1 of each year. The annual report shall be organized by basin, as defined in Section 10721, within the service area of the agricultural water supplier, if applicable.

(2) The report, and any amendments to the report, submitted to the department pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted electronically and shall include any standardized forms,
 tables, or displays specified by the department.

(3) The department shall post all reports on its Internet Web site in a manner that allows for comparisons across water suppliers. The department shall make the reports available for public viewing in a timely manner after it receives them.

(b) Nothing in this article shall be construed to require the implementation of water measurement programs or practices that are not locally cost effective.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the requirements of this section shall complement and not affect the scope of authority granted to the department or the board by provisions of law other than this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 15, Sec. 1.   (AB 1668)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

531.15.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the law, state agencies shall carry out the duties described in this article only to the extent that funds are made available for the purposes of implementing those duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 675, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

531.20.

To the extent that the provisions of this article conflict with the requirements of Chapter 4800 of the State Administrative Manual, the requirements of that chapter shall control.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 675, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Irrigated Landscape [535. - 535.]

535.

(a) A water purveyor shall require as a condition of new retail water service on and after January 1, 2008, the installation of separate water meters to measure the volume of water used exclusively for landscape purposes.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to either of the following:

(1) Single-family residential connections.

(2) Connections used to supply water for the commercial production of agricultural crops or livestock.

(c) Subdivision (a) applies only to a service connection for which both of the following apply:

(1) The connection serves property with more than 5,000 square feet of irrigated landscape.

(2) The connection is supplied by a water purveyor that serves 15 or more service connections.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “new retail water service” means the installation of a new water meter where water service has not been previously provided, and does not include applications for new water service submitted before January 1, 2007.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 559, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Multiunit Structures [537. - 537.5.]

537.

(a) The structures in all of the following categories shall be exempt from this article:

(1) Low-income housing. For purposes of this paragraph, “low-income housing” means a residential building financed with low-income housing tax credits, tax-exempt mortgage revenue bonds, general obligation bonds, or local, state, or federal loans or grants, for which the rents of the occupants in lower income households, as defined in Section 50079.5 of the Health and Safety Code, do not exceed rents prescribed by deed restrictions or regulatory agreements pursuant to the terms of the financing or financial assistance, and for which not less than 90 percent of the dwelling units within the building are designated for occupancy by lower income households, as
 defined in Section 50079.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) Housing at a place of education, as defined in Section 202 of the California Building Standards Code (Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations).

(3) Long-term health care facilities, as defined in Section 1418 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) Time-share property, as defined in subdivision (aa) of Section 11212 of the Business and Professions Code.

(5) Residential care facilities for the elderly, as defined in Section 1569.2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) A submeter used to measure water supplied to an individual residential unit that is required pursuant to this chapter shall be of a type approved pursuant to Section
 12500.5 of the Business and Professions Code, and shall be installed and operated in compliance with regulations established pursuant to Section 12107 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 623, Sec. 5.   (SB 7)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2018, pursuant to Section 537.5.)
-------------------------------------------

537.1.
